California statutes. Public Resources Code
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tentative Reservations [41710. - 41712.]

41710.

(a) A county may tentatively reserve an area or areas for the location of a new solid waste transformation or disposal facility or the expansion of an existing transformation or disposal facility even though that reservation of the area or areas is not consistent with the applicable city or county general plan. A reserved area in a countywide siting element is tentative until it is made consistent with the applicable city or county general plan.

(b) If a county has tentatively identified a site expansion or a potential site for a new solid waste transformation or disposal facility in its countywide siting element, that tentative site identification may be deemed a tentative area for the purposes of Sections 41711 and 41712.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41711.

An area tentatively reserved for the establishment or expansion of a solid waste transformation or disposal facility shall be removed from the countywide siting element if a city or county fails or has failed to make the finding that the area is consistent with the general plan or has made a finding that the area should not be used for the location of a solid waste transformation or disposal facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

41712.

The removal of a tentatively reserved area from the countywide siting element, pursuant to Section 41711, shall be accomplished by either one of the following methods:

(a) The county shall remove the area at the time of the next revision of the siting element.

(b) The local agency having jurisdiction over the area shall request the county to remove the designation at the time of the next revision of the siting element.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Plan Consistency [41720. - 41720.]

41720.

The countywide siting element submitted to the board, shall include a resolution from each affected city or the county stating that any areas identified for the location of a new or expanded solid waste transformation or disposal facility pursuant to Section 41701 is consistent with the applicable general plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Agency Approval [41721. - 41721.5.]

41721.

(a) The countywide siting element shall be approved by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county that contain a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county except in those counties that have only two cities, in which case the element is subject to approval of the city that contains the majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county. Each city shall act upon the countywide siting element within 90 days after receipt of the siting element. If a city fails to act upon the siting element within 90 days after receiving the siting element, the city shall be deemed to have approved the siting element as submitted.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a siting element providing for an EMSW conversion facility is only required to be approved by the city in which it is located, or if the EMSW is not located in a city, by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 411, Sec. 9.   (AB 1126)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

41721.5.

(a) Any amendments to the countywide siting element shall be approved by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county which contain a majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county except in those counties which have only two cities, in which case the amendment is subject to approval of the city which contains the majority of the population of the incorporated area of the county.

(b) Any person or public agency proposing the development of a solid waste disposal or transformation facility may initiate an amendment to the countywide siting element by submitting a site identification and description to the county board of supervisors.

(c) The county shall submit the site identification and description to the cities within the county within 20 days after the site identification and description is submitted to the county board of supervisors. Each city shall act upon the proposed amendment within 90 days after receipt of the proposed amendment. If a city fails to act upon the proposed amendment within 90 days after receiving the amendment, the city shall be deemed to have approved the proposed amendment as submitted.

(d) If the county or a city disapproves the proposed amendment, the county or city shall mail notice of its decision by first-class mail to the person or public agency proposing the amendment within 10 days of the disapproval, stating its reasons for the disapproval.

(e) No county or city shall disapprove a proposed amendment unless it determines, based on substantial evidence in the record, that the amendment would cause one or more significant adverse impacts within its boundaries from the proposed project.

(f) Within 45 days after the date of disapproval by the county or a city of a proposed amendment, or a decision by the board not to concur in the issuance, modification, or revision of a solid waste facilities permit pursuant to Section 44009, any person may file with the superior court a writ of mandate for review of the disapproval or the decision. The evidence before the court shall consist of the record before the county or city which disapproved the proposed amendment or the record before the board in its determination not to concur in issuance, modification, or revision of the solid waste facilities permit. Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure shall govern the proceedings conducted pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1291, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Nondisposal Facility Elements [41730. - 41736.]



  ARTICLE 1. City Nondisposal Facility Elements [41730. - 41730.]

41730.

Except as provided in Section 41750.1, each city shall prepare, adopt, and, except for a city and county, transmit to the county in which the city is located a nondisposal facility element that includes all of the information required by this chapter and that is consistent with the implementation of a city source reduction and recycling element adopted pursuant to this part. The nondisposal facility element and any updates to the element shall not be subject to the approval of the county and the majority of cities with the majority of the population in the incorporated area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 3.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. County Nondisposal Facility Element [41731. - 41731.]

41731.

Except as provided in Section 41750.1, each county shall prepare, adopt, and, except for a city and county, transmit to the cities located in the county a nondisposal facility element that includes all of the information required by this chapter and that is consistent with the implementation of a county source reduction and recycling element adopted pursuant to this part. The nondisposal facility element and any updates to the element shall not be subject to the approval of the majority of cities with the majority of the population in the incorporated area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 4.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Requirements [41732. - 41736.]

41732.

(a) City, county, and regional agency nondisposal facility elements prepared pursuant to Section 41730, 41731, or 41750.1, as the case may be, shall include a description of any new solid waste facilities and the expansion of existing solid waste facilities that will be needed to implement the jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element and to thereby meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780. The nondisposal facility element may include the identification of specific locations or general areas for new solid waste facilities that will be needed to implement the jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element.

(b) In complying with the requirements of subdivision (a), the jurisdiction shall utilize the pertinent information that is available to it at the time that the nondisposal facility element is prepared.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 183, Sec. 301.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

41733.

Nondisposal facility elements prepared pursuant to this chapter shall include all solid waste facilities and solid waste facility expansions, except disposal facilities and transformation facilities, which will recover for reuse or recycling at least 5 percent of the total volume of material received by the facility. Transfer stations which recover less than 5 percent of the volume of materials received for reuse or recycling shall be included in the element. However, the portions of the element describing these facilities shall not be subject to board approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1291, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41734.

(a) (1) Prior to adopting a nondisposal facility element, the city, county, or regional agency shall submit the element to the task force created pursuant to Section 40950 for review and comment.

(2) Prior to adopting a regional agency nondisposal facility element, if the jurisdiction of the regional agency extends beyond the boundaries of a single county, the regional agency shall submit the element for review and comment to each task force created pursuant to Section 40950 of each county within the jurisdiction of the regional agency.

(b) Comments by the task force shall include an assessment of
 the regional impacts of potential diversion facilities and shall be submitted to the city, county, or regional agency and to the department within 90 days of the date of receipt of the nondisposal facility element for review and comment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 5.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41734.5.

(a) Once a nondisposal facility element has been adopted, the city, county, or regional agency shall update all information required to be included in the nondisposal facility element, including, but not limited to, new information regarding existing and new, or proposed, nondisposal facilities.

(b) Updates shall be provided to the department within 30 days of any change in information.

(c) Copies of the updated information shall also be provided to the local task force and shall be appended or otherwise added to the nondisposal facility element.

(d) The local task force shall not be required to review and comment on the updates to the nondisposal facility elements.

(e) Updates to the nondisposal facility elements are not subject to approval by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 6.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41735.

(a) Notwithstanding Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000), the adoption or update of a nondisposal facility element shall not be subject to environmental review.

(b) Local agencies may impose a fee on project proponents to fund their necessary and actual costs of preparing and approving updates to nondisposal facility elements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 7.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41736.

It is not the intent of the Legislature to require cities and counties to revise their source reduction and recycling elements to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 8.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Countywide Integrated Waste Management Plans [41750. - 41770.]



  ARTICLE 1. Plan Preparation [41750. - 41751.]

41750.

Each county and city and county shall prepare and submit to the board in accordance with the schedule set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 41780), a countywide integrated waste management plan, which includes all of the following:

(a) All city source reduction and recycling elements prepared pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 41000) and submitted to the county.

(b) The county’s source reduction and recycling element for the unincorporated area of the county prepared pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 41300).

(c) All city household hazardous waste elements which were prepared pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 41500) of Chapter 3.5 and submitted to the county.

(d) The county household hazardous waste element for the unincorporated area of the county prepared pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 41510) of Chapter 3.5.

(e) The countywide siting element prepared pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 41700).

(f) All city nondisposal facility elements prepared pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 41730) and submitted to the county.

(g) The county nondisposal facility element for the unincorporated area of the county prepared pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 41730).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1291, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41750.1.

Notwithstanding the requirements of Section 41750 for the preparation and submittal of countywide integrated waste management plans, the following requirements shall apply to the submittal of integrated waste management plans where a regional agency has been formed:

(a) For a regional agency composed of jurisdictions that do not extend beyond the boundaries of a single county, the countywide integrated waste management plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The source reduction and recycling elements for the cities and the county which are member agencies of the regional agency or the source reduction and recycling element for the regional agency.

(2) The source reduction and recycling elements for all cities which are not member agencies of the regional agency, and the source reduction and recycling element for the unincorporated area if the county is not a member agency of the regional agency.

(3) The household hazardous waste elements for the cities and the county which are member agencies of the regional agency or the household hazardous waste element for the regional agency.

(4) The household hazardous waste elements for all cities which are not a member agency of the regional agency, and the household hazardous waste element for the unincorporated area if the county is not a member agency of the regional agency.

(5) The countywide siting element.

(6) The nondisposal facility elements for the cities and the county which are member agencies of the regional agency or the nondisposal facility element for the regional agency.

(7) The nondisposal facility elements for all cities which are not member agencies of the regional agency, and the nondisposal facility element for the unincorporated area if the county is not a member agency of the regional agency.

(b) For a regional agency composed of two or more counties and all cities within those counties, an integrated waste management plan shall include all of the following:

(1) The source reduction and recycling elements for the cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency or the source reduction and recycling element for the regional agency.

(2) The household hazardous waste elements for the cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency or the household hazardous waste element for the regional agency.

(3) The countywide siting elements for the counties within the jurisdiction of the regional agency or a siting element for the regional agency.

(4) The nondisposal facility elements for the cities and counties which are member agencies of the regional agency or the nondisposal facility element for the regional agency.

(c) For a regional agency composed of more than one county, but which does not encompass all of the cities within those counties, the integrated waste management plan shall include the source reduction and recycling element and the household hazardous waste element for the regional agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 663, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

41751.

The countywide integrated waste management plan shall include a summary of significant waste management problems facing the county or city and county. The plan shall provide an overview of the specific steps that will be taken by local agencies, acting independently and in concert, to achieve the purposes of this division. The plan shall contain a statement of the goals and objectives set forth by the countywide task force created pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 40900).

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1095, Sec. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Plan Approval [41760. - 41760.]

41760.

The countywide integrated waste management plan and any amendments thereto, with the exception of any source reduction and recycling element, household hazardous waste element, or nondisposal facility element, prepared by a city or county, shall be approved by the county and by a majority of the cities within the county which contain a majority of the population of the incorporated areas of the county, except in those counties which have only two cities, in which case the plan is subject to the approval of the city which contains a majority of the population of the incorporated areas of the county. Each city shall act upon the plan and any proposed amendment within 90 days after receipt of the amendment. If a city fails to act upon the plan or the proposed amendment within 90 days after receiving the plan or the amendment, the city shall be deemed to have approved the plan or the amendment as submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 663, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Plan Revision [41770. - 41770.]

41770.

(a) Each countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan, and the elements thereof, shall be reviewed, revised, if necessary, and submitted to the board every five years in accordance with the schedule set forth under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 41800).

(b) Any revisions to a countywide or regional agency integrated waste management plan, and the elements thereof, shall use a waste disposal characterization method that the board shall develop for the use of the city, county, city and county, or regional agency. The city, county, city and county, or regional agency shall conduct waste disposal characterization studies, as prescribed by the board, if it fails to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780, at the time of the five-year revision of the source reduction and recycling element.

(c) The board may review and revise its regulations governing the contents of revised source reduction and recycling elements to reduce duplications in one or more components of these revised elements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Planning Requirements [41780. - 41794.]



  ARTICLE 1. Waste Diversion [41780. - 41783.1.]

41780.

(a) Each jurisdiction’s source reduction and recycling element shall include an implementation schedule that shows both of the following:

(1) For the initial element, the jurisdiction shall divert 25 percent of all solid waste by January 1, 1995, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(2) For the first and each subsequent revision of the element, the jurisdiction shall divert 50 percent of all solid waste on and after January 1, 2000, through source reduction, recycling, and composting activities.

(b) This section does not prohibit a
 jurisdiction from implementing source reduction, recycling, and composting activities designed to exceed the requirements of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 1.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41780.01.

(a) The Legislature hereby declares that it is the policy goal of the state that not less than 75 percent of solid waste generated be source reduced, recycled, or composted by the year 2020, and annually thereafter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall not establish or enforce a diversion rate on a city or county that is greater than the 50 percent diversion rate established pursuant to Section 41780.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 476, Sec. 9.   (AB 341)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

41780.05.

(a) After January 1, 2009, pursuant to the review authorized by Section 41825, the department shall determine each jurisdiction’s compliance with Section 41780 for the years commencing with January 1, 2007, by comparing each jurisdiction’s change in its per capita disposal rate in subsequent years with the equivalent per capita disposal rate that would have been necessary for the jurisdiction to meet the requirements of Section 41780 on January 1, 2007, as calculated pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (d).

(b) (1) For purposes of paragraph (5) of subdivision (e) of Section 41825, in making a determination whether a jurisdiction has made a good faith effort to
 implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element, the department shall consider, but is not limited to the consideration of, the jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate and whether the jurisdiction adequately implemented its diversion programs.

(2) When determining whether a jurisdiction has made a good faith effort pursuant to Section 41825 to implement its source reduction and recycling element or its household hazardous waste element, the department shall consider that an increase in the per capita disposal rate is the result of the amount of the jurisdiction’s disposal increasing faster than the jurisdiction’s growth. The department shall use this increase in the per capita disposal rate that is in excess of the equivalent per capita disposal rate as a factor in determining whether the
 department is required, pursuant to Section 41825, to more closely examine a jurisdiction’s program implementation efforts. This examination may indicate that a jurisdiction is required to expand existing programs or implement new programs, in accordance with the procedures specified in Article 4 (commencing with Section 41825) and in Article 5 (commencing with Section 41850).

(3) When reviewing the level of program implementation pursuant to Sections 41825 and 41850, the department shall use, as a factor in determining compliance with Section 41780, the amount determined pursuant to subdivision (d) when comparing a jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate in subsequent years.

(c) (1) (A) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, for
 purposes of this section, “per capita disposal” or “per capita disposal rate” means the total annual disposal, in pounds, from a jurisdiction divided by the total population in a jurisdiction, as reported by the Department of Finance, divided by 365 days.

(B) “Per capita disposal” does not include used tires or waste tires, as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 42800) of Chapter 16 of Part 3, that are converted at an EMSW conversion facility.

(C) “Per capita disposal” does not include biomass material, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 40106, that is converted at an EMSW conversion facility.

(2) (A) If a jurisdiction is predominated by commercial or industrial activities and by solid waste
 generation from those sources, the department may alternatively calculate per capita disposal to reflect those differing conditions.

(B) When making a calculation for a jurisdiction subject to this paragraph, “per capita disposal” or “per capita disposal rate” means the total annual disposal, in pounds, from a jurisdiction divided by total industry employment in a jurisdiction, as reported by the Employment Development Department, divided by 365 days.

(C) The department shall calculate the per capita disposal rate for a jurisdiction subject to this paragraph using the level of industry employment in a jurisdiction instead of the level of population in a jurisdiction.

(3) If the department determines that the method for
 calculating the per capita disposal rate for a jurisdiction provided by paragraph (1) or (2) does not accurately reflect that jurisdiction’s disposal reduction, the department may use an alternative per capita factor, other than population or industry employment, to calculate the per capita disposal rate that more accurately reflects the jurisdiction’s efforts to divert solid waste.

(d) The department shall calculate the equivalent per capita disposal rate for each jurisdiction as follows:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the equivalent per capita disposal rate for a jurisdiction shall be determined using the method specified in this paragraph.

(A) The calculated generation tonnage for each year from
 2003 to 2006, inclusive, shall be multiplied by 0.5 to yield the 50 percent equivalent disposal total for each year.

(B) The 50 percent equivalent disposal total for each year shall be multiplied by 2,000, divided by the population of the jurisdiction in that year, and then divided by 365 to yield the 50 percent equivalent per capita disposal for each year.

(C) The four 50 percent equivalent per capita disposal amounts from the years 2003 to 2006, inclusive, shall be averaged to yield the equivalent per capita disposal rate.

(2) If a jurisdiction is predominated by commercial or industrial activities and by solid waste generation from those sources, the department may alternatively calculate the equivalent per capita disposal
 rate to reflect those conditions by using the level of industry employment in a jurisdiction instead of the level of population in that jurisdiction.

(3) If the department determines that the method for calculating the equivalent per capita disposal rate for a jurisdiction pursuant to this subdivision does not accurately reflect a jurisdiction’s per capita disposal rate that would be equivalent to the amount required to meet the 50 percent diversion requirements of Section 41780, the department may use an alternative per capita factor, other than population or industry employment, to calculate the equivalent per capita disposal rate that more accurately reflects the jurisdiction’s diversion efforts.

(4) The department shall modify the percentage used in paragraph (1) to maintain
 the diversion requirements approved by the department for a rural jurisdiction pursuant to Section 41787.

(5) The department may modify the years included in making a calculation pursuant to this subdivision for an individual jurisdiction to eliminate years in which the calculated generation amount is shown not to be representative or accurate, based upon a generation study completed in one of the five years 2003 to 2007, inclusive. In these cases, the department shall not allow the use of an additional year other than 2003, 2004, 2005, 2006, or 2007.

(6) The department may modify the method of calculating the equivalent per capita disposal rate for an individual jurisdiction to accommodate the incorporation of a new city, the formation of a new regional agency, or changes in membership
 of an existing regional agency. These modifications shall ensure that a new entity has a new equivalent per capita disposal rate and that the existing per capita disposal rate of an existing entity is adjusted to take into account the disposal amounts lost by the creation of the new entity.

(7) The department shall not incorporate generation studies or new base year calculations for a year commencing after 2006 into the equivalent per capita disposal rate, unless a generation study that included the year 2007 was commenced on or before June 30, 2008.

(8) If the department determines that the equivalent per capita disposal rate cannot accurately be determined for a jurisdiction, or that the rate is no longer representative of a jurisdiction’s waste stream, the department shall
 evaluate trends in the jurisdiction’s per capita disposal to establish a revised equivalent per capita disposal rate for that jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 342, Sec. 2.   (AB 1857)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

41780.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this part, for the purposes of determining the amount of solid waste that a regional agency is required to divert from disposal or transformation through source reduction, recycling, and composting to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780, the regional agency shall use the solid waste disposal projections in the source reduction and recycling elements of the regional agency’s member agencies. The method prescribed in Section 41780.2 shall be used to determine the maximum amount of disposal allowable to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(b) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this part, for the purposes of determining the amount of solid waste that a city or county is required to divert from disposal or transformation through source reduction, recycling, and composting to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780, the city or county shall use the solid waste disposal projections in the source reduction and recycling elements of the city or county. The method prescribed in Section 41780.2 shall be used to determine the maximum amount of disposal allowable to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(c) To determine achievement of the diversion requirements of Section 41780 in 1995 and in the year 2000, projections of disposal amounts from the source reduction and recycling elements shall be adjusted to reflect annual increases or decreases in population and other factors affecting the waste stream, as determined by the board. By January 1, 1994, the board shall study the factors which affect the generation and disposal of solid waste and shall develop a standard methodology and guidelines to be used by cities, counties, and regional agencies in adjusting disposal projections as required by this section.

(d) The amount of additional diversion required to be achieved by a regional agency to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780 shall be equal to the sum of the diversion requirements of its member agencies. To determine the maximum amount of disposal allowable for the regional agency to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780, the maximum amount of disposal allowable for each member agency shall be added together to yield the agency disposable maximum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 978, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

41780.2.

(a) Each city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall determine the amount of reduction in solid waste disposal and the amount of additional diversion required from the base-year amounts by using the methods set forth in this section.

(b) The city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall multiply the total amount of base-year solid waste generation, as adjusted using the methods described in subdivision (c) of Section 41780.1, by 0.75 to determine the maximum amount of total disposal allowable in 1995 to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(c) The city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall multiply the total amount of base-year solid waste generation, as adjusted using the methods described in subdivision (c) of Section 41780.1, by 0.50 to determine the maximum amount of total disposal allowable in the year 2000 to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(d) The city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall multiply the total amount of base-year solid waste generation, as adjusted using the methods described in subdivision (c) of Section 41780.1, by 0.25 to determine the minimum amount of total diversion needed in the year 1995 to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(e) The city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall multiply the total amount of base-year solid waste generation, as adjusted using the methods described in subdivision (c) of Section 41780.1, by 0.50 to determine the minimum amount of total diversion needed in the year 2000 to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780.

(f) The city, county, or member agency of a regional agency shall subtract the total amount of base-year existing diversion from the minimum total diversion required as determined in subdivision (d) or (e) to determine the amount of additional diversion needed to meet the diversion requirements of Section 41780. This amount of additional diversion shall be equal to the minimum amount of additional reduction in disposal amounts which is needed to comply with Section 41780.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 179.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

41781.

(a) Except as provided in Sections 41781.1, and 41781.2, for the purpose of determining the base rate of solid waste from which diversion requirements shall be calculated, “solid waste” includes only the following:

(1) The amount of solid waste generated within a local agency’s jurisdiction, the types and quantities of which were disposed of at a permitted disposal facility as of January 1, 1990. Nothing in this section requires local agencies to perform waste characterization in addition to the waste characterization requirements established under Sections 41030, 41031, 41330, 41331, and 41332.

(2) The amount of solid waste diverted from a disposal facility, transformation facility, or EMSW facility, through source reduction, recycling, or composting.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “solid waste” does not include solid waste that would not normally be disposed of at a disposal facility.

(c) For the purposes of this chapter, the amount of solid waste from which the required reductions are measured shall be the amount of solid waste existing on January 1, 1990, with future adjustments for increases or decreases in the quantity of waste caused only by changes in population or changes in the number or size of governmental, industrial, or commercial operations in the jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 411, Sec. 11.   (AB 1126)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

41781.1.

(a) Prior to determining that the diversion of sludge may be counted toward the diversion requirements established under Section 41780, but within 180 days of receiving such a request, the board shall do both of the following:

(1) Make a finding at a public hearing, based upon substantial evidence, that the sludge has been adequately analyzed and will not pose a threat to public health or the environment for the reuse which is proposed.

(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), prior to making the finding required to be made pursuant to this paragraph, the board shall consult with each of the following agencies, and obtain their concurrence in the finding, to the extent of each agency’s jurisdiction over the sludge or its intended reuse:

(i) The state water board and the regional water boards.

(ii) The State Department of Health Services.

(iii) The State Air Resources Board and air pollution control districts and air quality management districts.

(iv) The Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(B) If, prior to the board making the finding required to be made pursuant to this paragraph, an agency specified in subparagraph (A) issues a permit, waste discharge requirements, or imposes other conditions for the reuse of sludge, the agency shall have been deemed to have concurred in that finding.

(2) Establish, or ensure that one or more of the agencies specified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) establishes, ongoing monitoring requirements which ensure that the proposed sludge reuse does not pose a threat to health and safety or the environment.

(b) It is not the intent of this section to require the board, or the agencies listed in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), to impose additional requirements or approval procedures for sludge or sludge reuse applications, apart from the requirements and approval procedures already imposed by state and federal law. It is the intent of this section to require that the board determine that each sludge diversion, for which diversion credit is sought, meets all applicable requirements of state and federal law, and thereby provides for maximum protection of the public health and safety and the environment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1293, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

41781.2.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section not to require cities, counties, and regional agencies to revise source reduction and recycling elements prior to their submittal to the board for review and approval, except as the elements would otherwise be required to be revised by the board pursuant to this part. Pursuant to Sections 41801.5 and 41811.5, compliance with this section shall be determined by the board when source reduction and recycling elements are submitted to the board pursuant to Section 41791.5. However, any city or county may choose to revise its source reduction and recycling element or any of its components prior to board review of the source reduction and recycling element for the purpose of complying with this section.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to ensure that compliance with the diversion requirements of Section 41780 shall be accurately determined based upon a correlation between solid waste which was disposed of at permitted disposal facilities and diversion claims which are subsequently made for that solid waste.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meaning:

(1) “Action by a city, county, regional, or local governing body” means franchise or contract conditions, rate or fee schedules, zoning or land use decisions, disposal facility permit conditions, or activities by a waste hauler, recycler, or disposal facility operator acting on behalf of a city, county, regional agency, or local governing body, or other action by the local governing body if the local government action is specifically related to the claimed diversion.

(2) “Scrap metal” includes ferrous metals, nonferrous metals, aluminum scrap, other metals, and auto bodies, but does not include aluminum cans, steel cans, or bimetal cans.

(3) “Inert solids” includes rock, concrete, brick, sand, soil, fines, asphalt, and unsorted construction and demolition waste.
